Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2302
Incentive payments; county highway or city street superintendents; requirements.

No person shall be appointed by any county as a county highway superintendent or by any municipality as a city street superintendent to qualify for the incentive payments provided in sections 39-2501 to 39-2505 for counties and municipal counties or sections 39-2511 to 39-2515 for municipalities and municipal counties unless he or she has been licensed under the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act or is exempt from such licensure requirement as provided in section 39-2504 or 39-2514.

Laws 1969, c. 144, § 2, p. 665;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 5.